Massachusetts, session 194th, H1302.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
4D, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following 
section:-  
Section 4D. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meaning unless the context clearly requires otherwise:  
“Liquid fuel tank”, a tank in which heating oil is stored and from which heating oil is 
delivered or pumped through a fuel supply line to an oil burner, whether located within a 
dwelling or other structure, including tanks installed at or below grade level or located outdoors 
but excluding underground tanks wherever located.  

of 3 10  “Residential property”, a 1-unit to 4-unit dwelling used for living or sleeping.  
(b) (1) The joint underwriting association formed pursuant to section 4 of chapter 175C 
and any insurer licensed to write and engaged in the writing of homeowners’ insurance shall 
provide the following coverage to owners of residential property to whom a homeowners’ 
insurance policy is issued or renewed: (i) first-party property coverage for response action costs 
incurred under chapter 21E or chapter 21K or any regulation promulgated pursuant to said 
chapter 21E or chapter 21K and property damage on the insured’s residential property caused by 
or in response to a release of heating oil from a residential liquid fuel tank or any piping, fuel 
supply lines, equipment or systems connected thereto; and (ii) liability coverage for third-party 
claims arising out of a release of heating oil into the environment.  
(2) For the purposes of this section, first-party property coverage shall include 
response action costs incurred to assess and remediate a heating oil release impacting soil, indoor 
air or other environmental media on the insured’s residential property and the reimbursement of 
any associated personal property damage. For the purposes of this section, third-party liability 
coverage shall include: (i) the obligation to defend the insured at the insurer’s expense against 
third-party claims; provided, however, that such defense obligation shall include coverage for 
costs incurred to investigate the source and extent of the release of heating oil; and (ii) response 
action costs incurred to address conditions on and off the insured’s residential property arising 
from a heating oil release on the insured’s residential property that has impacted, or is likely to 
impact, groundwater or has migrated to, or is likely to migrate to, a third-party’s property. 
(3) First-party property coverage and third-party liability coverage shall apply 
simultaneously and in addition to each other when both coverages are applicable. Insurers may 

of 3 32 include a reasonable charge for such coverage in premiums applicable to all homeowners' 
insurance policies The minimum coverage shall be $75,000 per occurrence for first-party 
property coverage and $250,000 per occurrence for third-party liability coverage, subject to a 
reasonable deductible not to exceed $1,000 per claim.  
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), the joint underwriting association and an insurer may 
include an exclusion in homeowners’ insurance policies from the coverages required pursuant to 
said subsection (b) where the heating oil release would not have occurred but for the owner’s 
failure to comply with the requirements of said subsection (b) or subsection (c) of section 38J of 
chapter 148, or any regulations promulgated pursuant to said subsection (b) or said subsection (c) 
of said section 38J of said chapter 148; provided, however, that the joint underwriting association 
or insurer has provided an annual written notice to the insured that explains, in at least 16-point 
type, such requirements under said chapter 148, and any regulations promulgated thereto, on a 
separate form approved by the division of insurance.  
SECTION 2. This act shall apply to policies issued or renewed on or after January 1, 
2024.